Utah statutes.
63H-4-108.   Relation to certain acts -- Participation in Risk Management Fund.

(1)  The authority is exempt from:

(a)  Title 51, Chapter 5, Funds Consolidation Act;

(b)  Title 63A, Utah Administrative Services Code;

(c)  Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code;

(d)  Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act; and

(e)  Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

(2)  The authority is subject to audit by the state auditor pursuant to Title 67, Chapter 3, Auditor, and by the legislative auditor general pursuant to Section 36-12-15.

(3)  Subject to the requirements of Subsection 63E-1-304(2), the authority may participate in coverage under the Risk Management Fund created by Section 63A-4-201.



Amended by Chapter 220, 2013 General Session

